test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-taehine13_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tähine: # Noun (13) tähine 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     tähine+N+Sg+Nom: tähine
     tähine+N+Sg+Gen: tähidse
     tähine+N+Sg+Par: tähist
     tähine+N+Sg+Ill: [tähitsehe, tähitsede]
     tähine+N+Sg+Ine: [tähitsen, tähitseh, tähitsehn]
     tähine+N+Sg+Ade: tähitsel
     tähine+N+Sg+Abl: tähitselt
     tähine+N+Sg+Tra: tähitses
     tähine+N+Sg+Ter: tähitseniq
     tähine+N+Sg+Abe: tähitseldäq
     tähine+N+Sg+Com: [tähitsegaq, tähidsegaq, tähitsega, tähidsega]
     tähine+N+Pl+Nom: tähidseq
     tähine+N+Pl+Gen: [tähitside, tähitsiide, tähiste]
     tähine+N+Pl+Par: [tähitsit, tähitsiid]
     tähine+N+Pl+Ill: [tähitsihe, tähitsiihe, tähitsiide, tähistehe, tähistede]
     tähine+N+Pl+Ine: [tähitsin, tähitsih, tähitsihn, tähitsiin, tähitsiih, tähitsiihn, tähisten, tähisteh, tähistehn]
     tähine+N+Pl+Ela: [tähitsist, tähitsiist, tähistest]
     tähine+N+Pl+All: [tähitsile, tähitsiile, tähistele]
     tähine+N+Pl+Ade: [tähitsil, tähitsiil, tähistel]
     tähine+N+Pl+Abl: [tähitsilt, tähitsiilt, tähistelt]
     tähine+N+Pl+Tra: [tähitsis, tähitsiis, tähistes]
     tähine+N+Pl+Ter: [tähitsiniq, tähitsiiniq, tähisteniq]
     tähine+N+Pl+Abe: [tähitsildäq, tähitsiildäq, tähisteldäq, tähitsildä, tähitsiildä, tähisteldä]
     tähine+N+Pl+Com: [tähitsidegaq, tähitsiidegaq, tähistegaq]
